Illinois, session 104th, HB3177.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Innovations for Transportation 5Infrastructure Act is amended by changing Section 15 as 6follows: 7    (630 ILCS 10/15)8    (Section scheduled to be repealed on July 1, 2032)9    Sec. 15. Authorization of project delivery methods. 10    (a) Notwithstanding any other law, and as authority 11supplemental to its existing powers, except as otherwise 12provided for in this Act, the Transportation Agency, in 13accordance with this Act, may use the design-build project 14delivery method for transportation facilities if the capital 15costs for transportation facilities delivered utilizing the 16design-build project delivery method or Construction 17Manager/General Contractor project delivery method or 18Alternative Technical Concepts in a design-bid-build project 19delivery method do not: (i) for transportation facilities 20delivered by the Department, exceed $500,000,000 $400 million 21of contracts awarded on an annual basis during the 22Department's multi-year highway improvement program for any 235-year period; or (ii) for transportation facilities delivered   HB3177 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 10935 LNS 21017 b1by the Authority, exceed 20% of the Authority's annual 2improvement program. The Transportation Agency shall make this 3calculation before commencing the procurement. Notwithstanding 4any other law, and as authority supplemental to its existing 5powers, the Department, in accordance with this Act, may use 6the Construction Manager/General Contractor project delivery 7method for up to 2 transportation facilities per year. Before 8commencing a procurement under this Act for either a 9design-build contract or a Construction Manager/General 10Contractor contract, the Transportation Agency shall first 11undertake an analysis and make a written determination that it 12is in the best interests of this State to use the selected 13delivery method for that transportation facility. The analysis 14and determination shall discuss the design-build project 15delivery method or Construction Manager/General Contractor 16project delivery method's impact on the anticipated schedule, 17completion date, and project costs. The best interests of the 18State analysis shall be made available to the public.19    (b) The Transportation Agency shall report to the General 20Assembly annually for the first 5 years after June 15, 2022 21(the effective date of this Act) on the progress of 22procurements and transportation facilities procured under this 23Act.24    (c) A contract entered into pursuant to the provisions of 25this Act is excepted from the Public Contract Fraud Act.26(Source: P.A. 102-1094, eff. 6-15-22; 103-154, eff. 6-30-23.)   HB3177 Enrolled- 3 -LRB104 10935 LNS 21017 b1    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 2becoming law.